North Carolina, session 2025, HB1231.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 163-82.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-82.19. Voter registration at drivers license offices; coordination on data interface.
(a) Voter Registration at Drivers License Offices. – The Division of Motor Vehicles
shall, pursuant to the rules adopted by the State Board of Elections, modify its forms so that any
eligible person who applies for original issuance, renewal or correction of a drivers license, or
special identification card issued under G.S. 20-37.7 may, on a part of the form, complete an
application to register to vote, or vote. A voter seeking to update the voter's registration if the
voter (i) has changed his or her address or moved from one precinct to another or from one county
to another. another or (ii) wants to change the voter's name or party affiliation, shall make those
changes at the appropriate county board of elections. The person taking the application shall ask
if the applicant is a citizen of the United States. If the applicant states that the applicant is not a
citizen of the United States, or declines to answer the question, the person taking the application
shall inform the applicant that it is a felony for a person who is not a citizen of the United States
to apply to register to vote. The application shall state in clear language the penalty for violation
of this section. The necessary forms shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The form
must ask for the previous voter registration address of the voter, if any. If a previous address is
listed, and it is not in the county of residence of the applicant, the appropriate county board of
elections shall treat the application as an authorization to cancel the previous registration and also
process it as such under the procedures of G.S. 163-82.9. If a previous address is listed and that
address is in the county where the voter applies to register, the application shall be processed as
if it had been submitted under G.S. 163-82.9.
Registration shall become effective as provided in G.S. 163-82.7. Applications to register to
vote accepted at a drivers license office under this section until the deadline established in
G.S. 163-82.6(d)(2) shall be treated as timely made for an election, and no person who completes
an application at that drivers license office shall be denied the vote in that election for failure to
apply earlier than that deadline.
All applications shall be forwarded by the Department of Transportation to the appropriate
board of elections not later than five business days after the date of acceptance, according to rules
*H1231-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections. Those rules shall provide for a
paperless, instant, electronic transfer of applications to the appropriate board of elections.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to changes in
voter registration occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 1231-First Edition